Tennessee, session 114, SB1244.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 36-3-625(f), is amended by adding
the following as a new subdivision:
(3) If the respondent dispossesses firearms by transferring possession to a third
party who is not prohibited from possessing firearms, then the respondent shall specify
the name of the third party and the physical address where all firearms are located. The
third party's signature acknowledging receipt of the respondent's firearms is required on
the affidavit of firearms dispossession form.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB1244
003126
- 1 -